District of Columbia statutes.
47-2885.15

Records.

(a)

There shall be maintained in every pharmacy, or in the establishment or institution where a pharmacy is located, a suitable book, file, or other easily retrievable record, in which shall be preserved for a period of not less than 2 years every prescription compounded or dispensed at said pharmacy.

(b)

(1)

There shall be maintained a bound volume recording the information required by law or regulation concerning the over-the-counter sales of those drugs which are listed in schedule V established or amended pursuant to the federal Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970 (21 U.S.C. § 801 et seq.).

(2)

There shall also be maintained a bound volume in which shall be entered similar information concerning each sale of:

(A)

Hypodermic syringes, needles, or other medical devices which may be used in the administration of controlled substances;

(B)

Gelatin capsules and glassine envelopes in quantities sufficient to indicate an intention to use such items in the distribution of controlled substances; and

(C)

Diluents or adulterants, such as lactose or quinine, in quantities sufficient to indicate an intention to use such substances for the illegal distribution or dispensing of any controlled substance.

(c)

The records required to be maintained by this section shall be available for inspection by the Mayor during regular business hours.

History

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-98, § 16, 27 DCR 3528
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2015.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.